California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 399, Sec. 7.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.   See prevailing version amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any program electing to operate both a before and after school component for the same pupils during summer, intersession, or vacation periods must operate these programs a minimum of four and one-half hours per day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 380, Sec. 17.   Effective September 21, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.25.

The State Department of Education shall provide notice to all schools eligible for grants under this article of the availability of such grants as well as the process for making application.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 49, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.3.

(a) The department shall select applicants to participate in the program established pursuant to this article from among applicants that apply on forms and in a manner prescribed by the department. It is the intent of the Legislature that the manner prescribed by the department, to the extent possible, allow for short and concise applicant responses.

(b) The department shall prioritize the following in selecting schools to participate in the program established pursuant to this article:

(1) Schoolsites not receiving funds for expanded learning opportunity programs provided pursuant to Section 46120.

(2) Schoolsites participating in the California Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900)).

(3) Percentage of pupils eligible for free and reduced-price lunch.

(4) Other indicators of need for the program, including, but not limited to, socioeconomic status of the neighborhoods in which participating pupils reside, the percentage of English language learners at the school, and the availability of programs in the community in which participating pupils reside.

(c) The application shall certify all of the following:

(1) Inclusion of an educational element.

(2) Inclusion of an enrichment element. These opportunities may include arts, career technical education, recreation, technology, and other activities to support positive youth development.

(3) That the program will provide a safe physical and emotional environment, opportunities for relationship building, and promote active pupil engagement.

(4) Staff training and development will be provided.

(5) Integration with the regular schoolday and other expanded learning opportunities.

(6) Community collaboration, including, but not limited to, demonstrated support of the schoolsite principal and staff.

(7) Opportunities for physical activity.

(8) Inclusion of a nutritional snack, meal, or both.

(9) Fiscal accountability.

(10) Availability of required local matching funds.

(11) That the program will meet all of the evaluation requirements.

(12) Collection and use of pupil social, behavioral, or skill development data collection to support quality program improvement processes. These pupil data outcomes may relate to specific social-emotional competencies, including, but not necessarily limited to, social skills, self-control, academic mindset, perseverance, conflict resolution, and school connectedness.

(d) Subdivision (b) does not apply to an applicant school that meets the priority criteria described in subdivision (a) of Section 8482.5.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 470, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 14.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.4.

(a) The administrator of every program established pursuant to this article shall establish minimum qualifications for each staff position that, at a minimum, ensure that all staff members who directly supervise pupils meet the minimum qualifications for an instructional aide, pursuant to the policies of the school district. Selection of the program site supervisors shall be subject to the approval of the schoolsite principal. The administrator shall also ensure that the program maintains a pupil-to-staff member ratio of no more than 20 to 1. All program staff and volunteers shall be subject to the health screening and fingerprint clearance requirements in current law and district policy for school personnel and volunteers in the school district.

(b) When a local educational agency contracts with a third party to operate a program pursuant to this article, the local educational agency shall require the third party to notify the local educational agency by the next working day following, and to submit a written report within seven days of, the occurrence of any health- or safety-related issues, including, but not limited to, issues involving criminal background clearances for employees, building safety, and any event specified in subdivision (c).

(c) For purposes of this section, an “event” includes any of the following:

(1) Death of a child from any cause.

(2) Any injury to a child that requires medical treatment.

(3) Any unusual
 incident or child absence that threatens the physical or emotional health or safety of a child.

(4) Any suspected child abuse or neglect, as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code.

(5) Epidemic outbreaks.

(6) Poisonings.

(7) Fires or explosions that occur in or on the premises.

(8) Exposure to toxic substances.

(9) An arrest of an employee of the third party.

(10) Any other event as specified by the local educational agency.

(d) When a local educational agency contracts with a third party,
 the local educational agency shall require the third party to request from parents or guardians pupil health information, such as whether a pupil has allergies or asthma, before pupil enrollment. Parents or guardians may provide this information at their discretion and are not required to provide pupil health information in order for the pupil to receive services pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 8.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a minimum of eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) be appropriated for the program established pursuant to this article, through the annual Budget Act. Of the funds appropriated for the program, current grant recipients have priority for receiving continued funding for the same purposes for which they previously received an award. This subdivision shall be in effect only until June 30, 2004.

(b) Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, and for each fiscal year thereafter, there shall be continuously appropriated to the State Department of Education from the General Fund for the program established pursuant to this article an amount not to exceed five hundred fifty million dollars ($550,000,000) that is the greater of (1) an amount equal to the appropriation from the General Fund for the program established pursuant to this article for the immediately preceding fiscal year, or (2) an amount equal to the sum of (A) the appropriation from the General Fund for the program established pursuant to this article for fiscal year 2003–04 and (B) the amount by which the state’s non-guaranteed General Fund appropriations for the current fiscal year exceed the sum of (i) the amount of the state’s non-guaranteed General Fund appropriations for the base year plus (ii) one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000). Nothing in this section prohibits the Legislature from appropriating funds for the program established pursuant to this article in excess of this continuous appropriation. 

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “state’s non-guaranteed General Fund appropriations” shall mean those General Fund appropriations of the state in a fiscal year other than those appropriations guaranteed to be applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts pursuant to Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. For purposes of this section, the “base year” is the fiscal year during the period July 1, 2000 through June 30, 2004 for which the state’s non-guaranteed General Fund appropriations are the highest as compared to any other fiscal year during such period.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), in any fiscal year in which the Legislature has legal authority pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution to reduce the moneys applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts for the current fiscal year as compared to the moneys applied by the state for the support of school districts and community colleges during the immediately preceding fiscal year, the continuous appropriation pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be reduced for that fiscal year by the same percentage by which the moneys applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts in the current fiscal year is less than the moneys applied by the state for the support of school districts and community college districts during the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(e) All funds expended pursuant to this article shall be used only for the purposes expressed in this article. Except for funds expended pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8482.55, all funds expended pursuant to this article shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing levels of service.

(History: Amended November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 49, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.51.

For purposes of Section 8483.5, the term “continuously appropriated” shall not be construed to mean “without regard to fiscal year.” The funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8483.5 are available for encumbrance for one year after the date upon which they first become available for encumbrance and are subject to Section 16304.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 1.   Effective February 16, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.55.

(a) From the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8483.5, the department may spend 1.5 percent to cover evaluation costs and to provide training and support to ensure quality program implementation, development, and sustainability and may pay its costs of awarding and monitoring grants.

(b) Beginning with the 2006–07 fiscal year, 1.5 percent of the funds appropriated pursuant to this article shall be available to the department for purposes of providing technical assistance, evaluation, and training services, and for providing local assistance funds to support program improvement and technical assistance.

(1) The department shall provide directly, or contract for, technical assistance for new programs and any program that is not meeting attendance or performance goals, or both, and requests that assistance. The department shall allocate an appropriate level of technical assistance funds to the regional system of support to support program startup within 45 days after grant awards to programs.

(2) (A) Training and support shall include, but is not limited to, the development and distribution of voluntary guidelines for physical activity programs established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8482.3, that expand the learning opportunities of the schoolday.

(B) The department shall distribute these voluntary guidelines for physical activity programs on or before July 1, 2009.

(c) The department shall contract for an independent statewide evaluation of the effectiveness of programs funded pursuant to this article to be prepared and submitted to the Legislature. The evaluation shall include a comparison of outcomes for participating pupils and similarly situated pupils who did not participate in the program. A report shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature on or before October 1, 2011, providing data that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Data collected pursuant to Section 8484.

(2) Data adopted through the process outlined in subdivision (b) of Section 8421.5 and subdivision (g) of Section 8482.4.

(3) Number and type of sites and grantees participating in the program.

(4) Pupil program attendance, as reported semiannually, and pupil schoolday attendance, as reported annually.

(5) Pupil program participation rates.

(6) Quality of program drawing on the research of the Academy of Sciences on critical features of programs that support healthy youth development.

(7) The participation rates of local educational agencies.

(8) Local partnerships.

(9) The academic performance of participating pupils in English language arts and mathematics, as measured by the results of the Standardized Testing and Reporting (STAR) Program established pursuant to Section 60640.

(d) A final report
 shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature on or before December 1, 2011. The final report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Updated data on the measures specified in subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, changes in those measures.

(2) The prevalence and frequency of activities included in funded programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 59.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 5, 2002, by initiative Prop. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.6.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 41202, in any fiscal year commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, that portion of any continuous appropriation made by Section 8483.5 for the program established pursuant to this article which is in excess of the amount appropriated for the program established pursuant to this article for the immediately preceding fiscal year shall not be appropriated until the Legislature has appropriated sums sufficient to fully fund the requirements of Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for that year and shall be appropriated in addition to the sums required by, and shall not be considered towards fulfilling the funding requirements of, Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for that fiscal year.

(History: Added November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 49, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.7.

(a) (1) (A) Each school that establishes a program pursuant to this article is eligible to receive a three-year after school grant, that shall be awarded in three one-year increments and is subject to semiannual attendance reporting and requirements as described in Section 8482.3 once every three years.

(B) The department shall provide technical support for development of a program improvement plan for grantees under the following conditions:

(i) If actual pupil attendance falls below 75 percent of the target attendance level in any year of the grant.

(ii) If the grantee fails, in any year of
 the grant, to demonstrate measurable outcomes pursuant to Section 8484.

(C) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the department shall adjust the grant level of any school within the program that is under its targeted attendance level by more than 15 percent in each of two consecutive years.

(ii) For a program that operates at a schoolsite located in an area that has a population density of less than 11 persons per square mile, the department shall adjust the grant level of any school within the program that is under its targeted attendance level by more than 35 percent in each of two consecutive years. 

(D) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), in any year after the initial grant year, if the actual attendance level of a school within the program falls below 75 percent
 of the target attendance level, the department shall perform a review of the program and adjust the grant level as the department deems appropriate.

(ii) For a program that operates at a schoolsite located in an area that has a population density of less than 11 persons per square mile, the department shall perform a review of the program and adjust the grant level as the department deems appropriate, if, in any year after the initial grant year, the actual attendance level of a school within the program falls below 55 percent of the target attendance level.

(E) The department shall create a process to allow a grantee to voluntarily lower its annual grant amount if one or more sites are unable to meet the proposed pupil attendance levels by the end of the second year of the grant.

(F) A grantee who has had its grant
 amount reduced may subsequently request an increase in funding up to the maximum grant amounts provided under this subdivision.

(G) The department may withhold or terminate the grant allocation of any site or program that does not comply with audit resolutions, fiscal reporting, attendance reporting, or outcomes reporting requirements required by the department.

(H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision or any other law, after the technical support required under subparagraph (B) has been provided, the department may at any time terminate the grant of a school in a program that fails for three consecutive years to meet either of the following requirements:

(i) Demonstrate measurable program outcomes pursuant to Section 8484.

(ii) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), attain 75 percent of its proposed attendance level after having had its program reviewed and grant level adjusted by the department.

(II) For a program that operates at a schoolsite located in an area that has a population density of less than 11 persons per square mile, attain 55 percent of its proposed attendance level after having had its program reviewed and grant level adjusted by the department.

(I) After school grants may be awarded to applicants that have demonstrated readiness to begin operation of a program or to expand existing programs.

(J) The maximum total after school grant amount awarded annually pursuant to this paragraph shall be one hundred twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($112,500) for each regular school year
 for each elementary school and one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for each regular school year for each middle or junior high school. The Superintendent shall determine the total annual after school grant amount for which a site is eligible based on a formula of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per pupil per day of pupil attendance that the program plans to serve, with a maximum total grant of thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($37.50) per projected pupil per week, and a formula of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per projected pupil per day of staff development, with a maximum of three staff development days per year. A program may provide the three days of staff development during regular program hours using funds from the total grant award.

(2) For large schools, the maximum total grant amounts described in paragraph (1) may be increased based on the following formulas, up to a maximum amount of twice the respective
 limits specified in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (1):

(A) For elementary schools, multiply one hundred thirteen dollars ($113) by the number of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite for the normal schoolday program that exceeds 600.

(B) For middle schools, multiply one hundred thirteen dollars ($113) by the number of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite for the normal schoolday program that exceeds 900.

(3) The maximum total grant amounts set forth in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (1) may be increased from any funds made available for this purpose in the annual Budget Act for participating schools that have pupils on waiting lists for the program. Grants may be increased by the lesser of an amount that is either 25 percent of the current maximum total grant amount or equal to the proportion of pupils unserved by the
 program as measured by documented waiting lists as of January 1 of the previous grant year, compared to the actual after school enrollment on the same date. The amount of the required cash or in-kind matching funds shall be increased accordingly. First priority for an increased maximum grant pursuant to this paragraph shall be given to schools that qualify for funding pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8482.55. Second priority shall be given to schools that receive funding priority pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 8482.55.

(4) The minimum total after school grant amount for each schoolsite that may be awarded pursuant to this section shall be computed by multiplying the applicable rate per pupil per day of pupil attendance by 20 pupils being served for 180 regular schooldays.

(5) Additional funding may be made available for transportation in programs that meet the
 requirements of Section 8484.65, in an amount not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per site, per school year, as funds are available, in accordance with the local community after school program needs as determined by the department. Programs shall submit to the department for consideration evidence of the need for after school transportation funds specific to after school programs pursuant to this article. Funding under this paragraph may be used to supplement, but not supplant, local transportation services.

(6) Each program shall provide an amount of cash or in-kind local funds equal to not less than one-third of the total grant from the school district, governmental agencies, community organizations, or the private sector. Facilities or space usage may fulfill not more than 25 percent of the required local contribution.

(7) (A) A grantee may
 allocate, with departmental approval, up to 125 percent of the maximum total grant amount for an individual school, so long as the maximum total grant amount for all school programs administered by the program grantee is not exceeded.

(B) A program grantee that transfers funds for purposes of administering a program pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall have an established waiting list for enrollment, and may transfer only from another school program that has met a minimum of 70 percent of its attendance goal. This subparagraph does not apply to a program that operates at a schoolsite located in an area that has a population density of less than 11 persons per square mile.

(b) The administrator of a program established pursuant to this article may supplement, but not supplant, existing funding for after school programs with grant funds awarded pursuant to this article. State
 categorical funds for remedial education activities shall not be used to make the required contribution of local funds for those after school programs.

(c) Up to 15 percent of the initial year’s grant amount for each grant recipient may be used for startup costs. Under no circumstance shall funding for startup costs result in an increase in the grant recipient’s total funding above the approved grant amount.

(d) For each year of the grant, the department shall award the total grant amount for that year not later than 30 days after the date the grantee accepts the grant.

(e) The department may adjust the amount of a direct grant, awarded to a new applicant pursuant to this section, on the basis of the program start date, as determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 265, Sec. 3.   (AB 2622)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.75.

(a) (1) (A) Each school that establishes a before school program component pursuant to Section 8483.1 is eligible to receive a three-year renewable after school grant, that shall be awarded in three one-year increments and is subject to semiannual attendance reporting and renewal as required by the department. Before school programs established pursuant to this section shall be subject to the same reporting and accountability provisions described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7.

(B) The maximum total grant amount awarded annually pursuant to this paragraph shall be thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500) for each regular school year for each elementary school and
 forty-nine thousand dollars ($49,000) for each regular school year for each middle or junior high school.

(C) The Superintendent shall determine the total annual after school grant amount for which a site is eligible based on a formula of five dollars ($5) per pupil per day that the program plans to serve, with a maximum total grant of twenty-five dollars ($25) per projected pupil per week.

(2) For large schools, the maximum total grant amounts described in paragraph (1) may be increased based on the following formulas, up to a maximum amount of twice the respective limits specified in paragraph (1):

(A) For elementary schools, multiply seventy-five dollars ($75) by the number of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite for the normal schoolday program that exceeds 600.

(B) For middle schools, multiply seventy-five dollars ($75) by the number of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite for the normal schoolday program that exceeds 900.

(3) A school that establishes a program pursuant to this section is eligible to receive a summer/supplemental grant to operate the program in excess of 180 regular schooldays during any combination of summer, intersession, or vacation periods for a maximum of 30 percent of the total grant amount awarded to the school per school year under this subdivision.

(4) Each program shall provide an amount of cash or in-kind local funds equal to not less than one-third of the total grant from the school district, governmental agencies, community organizations, or the private sector. Facilities or space usage may fulfill not more than 25 percent of the required local contribution.

(5) (A) The department may award up to 125 percent of the maximum total grant amount for an individual school, so long as the maximum total grant amount for all school programs administered by the program grantee is not exceeded.

(B) A program grantee that is awarded funds pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall have an established waiting list for enrollment, and may receive funds only from another school program that has met a minimum of 70 percent of its attendance goal.

(b) The administrator of a program established pursuant to this article may supplement, but not supplant, existing funding for before school programs with grant funds awarded pursuant to this article. State categorical funds for remedial education activities shall not be used to make the required contribution of local funds for those
 before school programs.

(c) Up to 15 percent of the initial year’s grant amount for each grant recipient may be used for startup costs. Under no circumstance shall funding for startup costs result in an increase in the grant recipient’s total funding above the approved grant amount.

(d) For each year of the grant, the department shall award the total grant amount for that year not later than 30 days after the date the grantee accepts the grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 3.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.76.

(a) A school that establishes a program pursuant to Section 8483.7 or 8483.75 is eligible to receive a summer/supplemental grant to operate the program in excess of 180 regular schooldays or during any combination of summer, weekends, intersession, or vacation periods for a maximum of 30 percent of the total grant amount awarded, per school year, to the school.

(b) An existing after school summer/supplemental grantee may operate a three-hour or a six-hour per day program. If the grantee operates a six-hour per day program, the target attendance level for the purpose of grant reductions pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7 shall be computed as if the grant award were based upon the lesser of fifteen dollars ($15) per
 day of pupil attendance or 30 percent of the total grant awarded to the school per school year.

(c) A summer/supplemental grantee that operates a program pursuant to this section may change the location of the program to address the needs of pupils and school closures. The program may be conducted at an offsite location or at an alternate schoolsite. The summer/supplemental grantee shall give notice to the department of the change of location and shall include a plan to provide safe transportation pursuant to Section 8484.6.

(d) A summer/supplemental grantee that operates a program pursuant to this section may open eligibility to every pupil attending a school in the school district. Priority for enrollment shall be given to the pupils enrolled in the school that receives the grant.

(e) A summer/supplemental grantee
 operating a six-hour per day program shall provide for each needy pupil at least one nutritionally adequate free or reduced-price meal during each program day.

(f) A summer/supplemental grantee that operates a six-hour per day program is required to submit, for prior approval by the department, a revised program plan that includes all of the following:

(1) A plan for provision of the free or reduced-price meal required by subdivision (e).

(2) An attendance and early release policy for the program that is consistent with the local educational agency’s early release policy for the regular schoolday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 4.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.8.

In any fiscal year, if a program participant receives state funds to operate a program pursuant to this article that are in an amount in excess of the amount warranted, due to the program serving fewer pupils than planned, to raising an inadequate amount of matching funds, or for any other reason, the State Department of Education shall reduce any subsequent allocations by an amount equal to that overpayment. If the program participant discontinues participation in the program and no allocations are made after the determination that an overpayment has been made, the State Department of Education shall take the following action:

(a) In the case of local education agencies, the State Department of Education shall bill the agencies for the amount of the overpayment. If payment is not received within three months of the billing invoice date, an amount equal to the amount of the overpayment shall be withheld from the next principal apportionment to the agency.

(b) In the case of entities other than local education agencies, the State Department of Education shall bill the entities for the amount of the overpayment, and pursue appropriate legal remedies if not paid.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 545, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.9.

(a) A program participant receiving funding pursuant to this article may expend on indirect costs no more than the lesser of the following:

(1) The school district’s indirect cost rate, as approved by the department for the appropriate fiscal year.

(2) Five percent of the state program funding received pursuant to this article.

(b) A program participant receiving state funding pursuant to this article may expend no more than 15 percent of that funding on administrative costs, which funding need not be earned through pupil attendance. For purposes of this
 section, administrative costs shall include indirect costs, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) A program participant receiving state funding pursuant to this program shall ensure that no less than 85 percent of that funding is allocated to schoolsites for direct services to pupils. The cost of a program site supervisor selected pursuant to Section 8483.4 may be included as direct services, provided that at least 85 percent of the site supervisor’s time is spent at the program site.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 553, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   (AB 434)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

8483.95.

It is the intent of the Legislature that a program established pursuant to this article shall not use its core operating funds for mandatory snacks or meals, but shall instead seek to qualify program sites as approved distribution sites for federally funded after school snacks or meals provided for by the National School Lunch Program, the Summer Food Service Program, the School Breakfast Program, or the Child and Adult Care Food Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 399, Sec. 8.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.

(a) As required by the department, programs established pursuant to this article shall submit annual outcome-based data for evaluation. The department may consider these outcomes when determining eligibility for grant renewal.

(1) To demonstrate program effectiveness, grantees shall submit, using the unique statewide pupil identifiers, for participating pupils who are unduplicated pupils, both of the following:

(A) Schoolday attendance on an annual basis.

(B) Program attendance on a semiannual basis.

(2) Programs shall submit evidence of a data-driven program quality improvement process that is based on the department’s guidance on program quality standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) The department may develop additional measures for this subdivision including, but not limited to, program quality standards. Additions shall be developed in consultation with the evaluation committee of the advisory committee.

(4) Programs shall submit information adopted through the process outlined in subdivision (c).

(b) (1) If a program consistently fails to demonstrate measurable program outcomes for three consecutive years, the
 department may terminate the program as described in subdivision (a) of Section 8483.7. The department shall consider multiple outcomes and not rely on one outcome in isolation.

(2) For purposes of this section, “consistently fails to
 demonstrate measurable program outcomes” means failure to meet program effectiveness requirements pursuant to the criteria in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) Measurable program outcomes may be demonstrated by, but are not limited to, comparing pupils participating in the program to nonparticipating pupils at the same schoolsite.

(c) The department shall develop standardized procedures and tools to collect the indicators in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). The department shall consult with the evaluation committee of the Advisory Committee on Before and After School Programs pursuant to Section 8484.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 18.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.1.

To the extent consistent with federal and state privacy laws, local educational agency grantees funded pursuant to this article and Article 22.6 (commencing with Section 8484.7) may submit the following pupil data to an operator of an after school program or summer program, or both, with which the local educational agency has a contract:

(a) Schoolday attendance data.

(b) Statewide test and assessment scores. 

(c) English language development test placement or reclassification scores.

(d) California Healthy Kids
 Survey results in aggregate form.

(e) Pupil engagement and behavioral data.

(f) Other academic measures, including grades and course completion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.3.

(a) Programs established pursuant to this article shall not be required to comply with the requirements of other provisions of this chapter or requirements set forth in Chapter 19 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, an After School Education and Safety Program (ASES) operated by a city, county, or nonprofit organization pursuant to this article may operate for up to 60 hours per week without obtaining a license or special permit under Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of Division
 2 of the Health and Safety Code, provided that a pupil shall not be allowed to attend the ASES program for more than 30 hours per week. An ASES program shall not receive any additional funding pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.5.

(a) All school-based before and after school programs established pursuant to Section 8481 that are in operation on the date of the enactment of the act adding this section shall elect one of the following options on or before July 1, 1999:

(1) Continuing operation as a schoolage community child care services program pursuant to the remaining operative provisions of Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460).

(2) Operating as an After School Learning and Safe Neighborhoods Partnerships Program pursuant to this article.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation for programs established pursuant to Section 8481 be redirected to the appropriation made for programs established pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 8460) or to the appropriation made for programs established pursuant to this article. The State Department of Education shall report the amounts that shall be redirected pursuant to this subdivision to the Department of Finance for approval and adjustment of the budget. The Controller shall adjust the appropriation amounts in accordance with budget revisions approved for this purpose by the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.6.

(a) Programs established pursuant to this article may be conducted upon the grounds of a community park, recreational facility, or other site as approved by the State Department of Education in the grant application process. Offsite programs shall align the educational and literacy component of the program with participating pupils’ regular school programs. No program located off school grounds shall be approved unless safe transportation is provided to the pupils enrolled in the program. Any reference to schoolsite as a physical location in this article shall mean schoolsite or other site as provided by this section.

(b) An offsite program conducted pursuant to this section shall comply with all statutory and regulatory requirements that are applicable to similar programs conducted on the schoolsite.

(History: Amended November 5, 2002, by initiative Proposition 49, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

8484.65.

If a program is operated at a schoolsite located in an area that has a population density of less than 11 persons per square mile, additional funding may be provided for transportation pursuant to Section 8483.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 370, Sec. 20.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22.6. 21st Century Community Learning Centers [8484.7. - 8484.9.]

8484.7.
